Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.040

Individual sureties—Examination—Approval.

In case such bond or recognizance is given in any action or proceeding commenced or pending in any court, the judge or clerk of any court of record or district court, or any party to the action or proceeding for the security or protection of which such bond or recognizance is made may, upon notice, require any of such sureties to attend before the judge at a time and place specified and to be examined under oath touching the surety's qualifications both as to residence and property as such surety, in such manner as the judge, in the judge's discretion, may think proper. If the party demanding the examination require it, the examination shall be reduced to writing and subscribed by the surety. If the judge finds the surety possesses the requisite qualifications and property, the judge shall endorse the allowance thereof on the bond or recognizance, and cause it to be filed as provided by law, otherwise it shall be of no effect.

[ 2000 c 171 s 58; 1987 c 202 s 186; 1927 c 162 s 3; RRS s 958-3. Formerly RCW 19.72.040, 19.72.050.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.